Washington statutes.
RCW 19.178.050

Business identification number—Ownership interest purposes limited—Application of consumer protection act.

(1) No person may conduct a going out of business sale except a person with a valid Washington state business identification number.

(2) No person may conduct a going out of business sale if a person who has an ownership interest in the business or in the merchandise to be sold established or acquired an ownership interest in the business solely or principally for the purpose of conducting a going out of business sale. A person who has either conducted a going out of business sale within one year or established or acquired an interest in the business conducting the sale within six months of recording the notice is presumed to have established or acquired an interest in the business solely or principally for the purpose of conducting a going out of business sale.

(3) No person may conduct a going out of business sale if a person who has an ownership interest in the business or in the merchandise to be sold is subject to a court order resulting from a civil enforcement action under the consumer protection act for a violation of this chapter or the type of conduct prohibited by this chapter.

[ 1993 c 456 s 7.]